Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.040

Fiscal support—Reimbursement to school districts—Enrollment fees—Deposit.

(1) Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated for traffic safety education.

(a) The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil reimbursement amount for the *traffic safety education course to be funded by the state. Each school district offering an approved standard *traffic safety education course shall be reimbursed or granted an amount up to the level established by the superintendent of public instruction as may be appropriated.

(b) The state superintendent may provide per-pupil reimbursements to school districts only where all the traffic educators have satisfied the continuing education requirement of **RCW 28A.220.030(4).

(2) The board of directors of any school district or combination of school districts may establish a traffic safety education fee, which fee when imposed shall be required to be paid by any duly enrolled student in any such school district prior to or while enrolled in a *traffic safety education course. Traffic safety education fees collected by a school district shall be deposited with the county treasurer to the credit of such school district, to be used to pay costs of the *traffic safety education course.

[ 2000 c 115 s 10; 1984 c 258 s 331; 1977 c 76 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 6; 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 5; 1963 c 39 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.08.070, 46.81.070.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "traffic safety education course" was renamed "driver training education course" by 2017 c 197 s 2.

**(2) RCW 28A.220.030 was amended by 2017 c 197 s 3, deleting subsection (4).

Finding—2000 c 115: See note following RCW 46.20.075.

Effective date—2000 c 115 ss 1-10: See note following RCW 46.20.075.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.

Severability—1977 c 76: See note following RCW 28A.220.010.

Traffic safety commission: Chapter 43.59 RCW.